District of Columbia statutes.
2-354.15

Collusion.

(a)

A person who enters into a contract with the District after engaging in collusion with another person for the purpose of defrauding the District shall be liable for damages equal to 3 times the value of the loss to the District attributable to the collusion.

(b)

If there is a reasonable basis for believing that collusion has occurred among any individuals or entities for the purpose of defrauding the District, the CPO shall send a written notice of this belief to the Attorney General and to the Mayor.

(c)

All documents involved in any procurement in which collusion is suspected shall be retained until the Attorney General gives notice that they may be destroyed. All documents shall be made available to the Attorney General.

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 415, 58 DCR 1185